Massachusetts, session 194th, S1576.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 244 the following new section:-
Section 245: Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the Board of
Registration in Medicine shall collect data and information concerning the cultural, ethnic,
linguistic, and educational composition of the physician workforce. The Board of Registration in
Medicine shall provide such data to the Center for Health Information and Analysis, to be made
publicly available for the purposes of assessing the impact of physician workforce diversity and
health outcomes in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
of 3

(a) The Board of Registration in Medicine shall request all applicants who submit
applications for licensure under Section 2 of Chapter 112 of the Massachusetts General Laws on
or after January 1, 2027, to provide the following information with their application:
1. Demographic information, including but not limited to race, ethnicity, and gender
identity.
2. Linguistic information
3. Medical specialty/subspecialty
4. Primary and secondary practice location, if known at the time of application;
5. Duration of practice in Massachusetts; and
6. Employment status: Part-time / full-time / per diem
(b) The Board of Registration in Medicine shall ask all license holders to provide the
following information when they renew their licenses on or after January 1, 2027, in addition to
any other information required by the relevant disciplining authority:
1. The information in subsection a(1) through (6) of this section, except, after license
holders who have provided this information one time, they shall be requested to provide only
changes to this information with subsequent renewals;
2. Whether the licensee is currently practicing;
3. Primary and secondary practice location at the time of renewal; and
4. Employment status: Part-time / full-time / per diem
of 3

(c) License applicants and licensees are not required to provide the requested data,
participation shall be voluntary. Data collected under this section shall be held separately and
will not be considered part of determinations for granting or renewing licensure.
(d) Data collected under this section shall be aggregated, de-identified and made publicly
available by the Center for Health Information and Analysis website no more than 60 days after
the end of each year.
(e) The Board of Registration in Medicine and The Center for Health Information and
Analysis shall not sell the information collected pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section
to any third party.
SECTION 2. The Center for Health Information and Analysis shall report on the data
collected under this section to the Clerks of the House and Senate, the Joint Committee on Public
Health, and the Department of Public Health no later than February 28th of each calendar year.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective 90 days after enactment.
of 3